Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The world health organization, united nations and the
world economic forum shall have no jurisdiction or power within the state
of Kansas. No rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy or mandate of any kind of
the world health organization, united nations and the world economic
forum shall be enforced or implemented by the state of Kansas or any
agency, department, board or commission, of the state or any municipality
or other political subdivision of the state.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.